Washington statutes.
RCW 28C.10.140

Violations—Criminal sanctions.

Any entity or any owner, officer, agent, or employee of such entity who wilfully violates RCW 28C.10.060 or 28C.10.090 is guilty of a gross misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine of not to exceed one thousand dollars or by imprisonment in the county jail for up to three hundred sixty-four days, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

Each day on which a violation occurs constitutes a separate violation. The criminal sanctions may be imposed by a court of competent jurisdiction in an action brought by the attorney general of this state.

[ 2011 c 96 s 23; 1986 c 299 s 14.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2011 c 96: See note following RCW 9A.20.021.